Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Article 5. Remedies and Penalties

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

17 Am. Jur. 2d Consumer and Borrower Protection §§ 357 to 374.

Survivability of action brought under Truth in Lending Act (15 USC § 1601 et seq.), 53 ALR Fed 431.

21 C.J.S. Credit Reporting Agencies; Consumer Protection §§ 104 to 122.